dicts/hsb/hsb.dic
dolěze/GH
žuć/NCD
šić/NCD
škrěć/NCD
łhać/NCD
ćeče/NGOQ
bać/NCD
bić/NCD
bodźe/GQHN
być/BN
dlić/NCD
dobić/NCZ
dobyć/BN
docpěć/NCFZ
dodrěć/NCFZ
dohrać/NCZ
dojědźe/GKN
dokładźe/GHN
dokłóć/NCFZ
domyć/NCZ
donabyć/BN
dóńdźe/GHN
donjese/GHN
napić/NCZ
dopječe/NGO
dopleće/GHN
dopředźe/GNJ
dopřewjedźe/GHN
dorosće/GHN
dorozbić/NCZ
dosyć/NCZ
dosyče/NGO
dotkać/NCZ
dowjedźe/GHN
dowjeze/GHN
dowleče/NGO
dowobleče/NGO
dowotbyć/BN
dowotemrěć/NCFZ
dozabić/NCZ
dozabyć/BN
drěć/NCFD
duć/NCD
čuć/NCD
hnić/NCD
hnuć/NCD
hrać/NCD
hrěć/NCD
jědźe/GQKN
kładźe/GHN
kłóć/NCFD
kćěć/NCFD
křćić/NCD
krać/NCD
kryć/NCD
leče/NGJQ
měć/ND
mjeće/GHNQ
mjeće/GNQJ
mlěć/NCFD
mrěć/NCFD
myć/NCD
našić/NCZ
nabać/NCZ
nabyć/BN
nadeńdźe/GHN
nadhrěć/NCZ
nadrěć/NCFZ
naduć/NCZ
nadwobleče/NGO
nahrać/NCZ
nakładźe/GHN
naleče/NGJ
namlěć/NCFZ
nańdźe/GHN
nanjese/GHN
napječe/NGO
napleće/GHN
napředźe/GNJ
narosće/GHN
natkać/NCZ
nawěć/NCZ
nawobleče/NGO
njeńdźe/GHQ
njese/GHNQ
pase/GHNQ
přepase/GHN
zapase/GHN
pić/NCD
pječe/NGOQ
pleće/GHNQ
plěć/NCD
pošić/NCZ
pobyć/BN
podšić/NCZ
podeńdźe/GHN
podeprěć/NCFZ
podkładźe/GHN
podkłóć/NCFZ
podmlěć/NCFZ
podrosće/GHN
podwjedźe/GHN
přežuć/NCZ
přeć/NCD
přebyć/BN
předźe/GNQJ
předehrać/NCZ
předeńdźe/GHN
přednjese/GHN
předobyć/BN
předuć/NCZ
předwjedźe/GHN
přehnić/NCZ
přejědźe/GKN
překładźe/GHN
překłóć/NCFZ
překćěć/NCFZ
překřćić/NCZ
přemlěć/NCFZ
přemrěć/NCFZ
přeńdźe/GHN
přenjese/GHN
přepleće/GHN
póčrěć/NCFZ
přerosće/GHN
přesać/NCZ
přesleče/NGO
přestrěć/NCFZ
přetłać/NCZ
přewić/NCZ
přewjedźe/GHN
přewjeze/GHN
přewobleče/NGO
přewobuć/NCZ
pohnuć/NCZ
přiškrěć/NCZ
přibyć/BN
přicpěć/NCFZ
přidobyć/BN
přihnuć/NCZ
přihrěć/NCZ
přijědźe/GKN
přikładźe/GHN
přińdźe/GHN
přinjese/GHN
připić/NCZ
připječe/NGO
připleće/GHN
připrěć/NCZ
přirosće/GHN
přischnyć/NCFZ
přisyć/NCZ
přiwjedźe/GHN
přiwjeze/GHN
přiwleče/NGO
přiwrěć/NCFZ
přizawrěć/NCFZ
přiznać/NCZ
pojědźe/GKN
pokładźe/GHN
poleče/NGJ
poměć/NCZ
pomrěć/NCFZ
pomyć/NCZ
popječe/NGO
popleće/GHN
porosće/GHN
poryć/NCZ
posyče/NGO
powić/NCZ
pozabyć/BN
pozbyć/BN
póznać/NCZ
prěć/NCFD
próć/NCFD
rosće/GHNQ
rozbić/NCZ
rozbodźe/GHN
rozdrěć/NCFZ
rozduć/NCZ
rozeńdźe/GHN
rozeprěć/NCFZ
rozewrěć/NCFZ
rozeznać/NCZ
rozhnuć/NCZ
rozjědźe/GKN
rozkładźe/GHN
rozkłóć/NCFZ
rozkćěć/NCFZ
rozmjeće/GHN
rozmjeće/GNJ
rozmlěć/NCFZ
roznjese/GHN
rozpleće/GHN
rozpředźe/GNJ
rozpřestrěć/NCFZ
rozpóznać/NCZ
rozprěć/NCFZ
rozpróć/NCFZ
rozrosće/GHN
rozsyć/NCZ
roztać/NCZ
roztołče/NGO
rozwěć/NCZ
rozwjedźe/GHN
rozwjeze/GHN
rozwleče/NGO
ruć/NCD
ryć/NCD
sać/NCD
schnyć/NCFD
składźe/GHN
sleče/NGO
spěć/NCD
spječe/NGO
spleće/GHN
spóznać/NCZ
stołče/NGO
strěć/NCFZ
syć/NCD
syče/NGOQ
tłać/NCD
tać/NCD
tkać/NCD
tołče/NGOQ
trać/NCD
trěć/NCFD
wić/NCD
wěć/NCD
wjedźe/GHNQ
wjeze/GHNQ
wleče/NGOQ
wobduć/NCZ
wobeńdźe/GHN
wobeschnyć/NCFZ
wobjědźe/GKN
wobkładźe/GHN
wobkryć/NCZ
wobleče/NGO
wobodrěć/NCFZ
wobrosće/GHN
wobryć/NCZ
wobwić/NCZ
wodźěć/NCZ
wokřeć/NCZ
wopječe/NGO
wopleće/GHN
wotškrěć/NCZ
wotbodźe/GHN
wotbyć/BN
wotdobyć/BN
wotdrěć/NCFZ
woteńdźe/GHN
woteschnyć/NCFZ
woteznać/NCZ
wothrać/NCZ
wotjědźe/GKN
wotkładźe/GHN
wotkćěć/NCFZ
wotkrać/NCZ
wotměć/NCZ
wotmjeće/GNJ
wotnjese/GHN
wotpić/NCZ
wotpleće/GHN
wotpředźe/GNJ
wotprěć/NCFZ
wótrěć/NCFZ
wotrosće/GHN
wotsyče/NGO
wotwić/NCZ
wotwjedźe/GHN
wotwjeze/GHN
wotwleče/NGO
wuškrěć/NCZ
wućeče/NGO
wuć/NCD
wubić/NCZ
wubyć/BN
wudobyć/BN
wudrěć/NCFZ
wučrěć/NCFZ
wuhrać/NCZ
wujědźe/GKN
wukładźe/GHN
wukłóć/NCFZ
wukřćić/NCZ
wuleče/NGJ
wumjeće/GHN
wumjeće/GNJ
wumlěć/NCFZ
wumrěć/NCFZ
wuńdźe/GHN
wunjese/GHN
wupić/NCZ
wupječe/NGO
wupleće/GHN
wupředźe/GNJ
wupřestrěć/NCFZ
wupróć/NCFZ
wurosće/GHN
wuryć/NCZ
wuschnyć/NZCF
wusleče/NGO
wusyče/NGO
wutłać/NCZ
wutołče/NGO
wutrěć/NCFZ
wuwěć/NCZ
wuwjedźe/GHN
wuwjeze/GHN
wuwleče/NGO
wuzawrěć/NCFZ
wuzuć/NCZ
zaškrěć/NCZ
zabodźe/GHN
zabyć/BN
zacpěć/NCFZ
zadobyć/BN
zadrěć/NCFZ
zaduć/NCZ
zahnuć/NCZ
zahrěć/NCZ
zajědźe/GKN
zakładźe/GHN
zakćěć/NCFZ
zakryć/NCZ
zamjeće/GNJ
zańdźe/GHN
zanjese/GHN
zapječe/NGO
zapleće/GHN
zapředźe/GNJ
zaprěć/NCFZ
zarosće/GHN
zaruć/NCZ
zastrěć/NCFZ
zasyče/NGO
zatkać/NCZ
zatołče/NGO
zawěć/NCZ
zawjedźe/GHN
zawjeze/GHN
zawleče/NGO
zawuć/NCZ
zbić/NCZ
zbodźe/GHN
zbyć/BN
zdobyć/BN
zdrěć/NCFZ
zduć/NCZ
zeškrěć/NCZ
zemlěć/NCFZ
zemrěć/NCFZ
zeńdźe/GHN
zeprěć/NCFZ
zeschnyć/NCFZ
zesyče/NGO
zetrěć/NCFZ
zezabyć/BN
zeznać/NCZ
zhnuć/NCZ
zjědźe/GKN
změć/NCZ
zmjeće/GHN
zmjeće/GNJ
zmlěć/NCFZ
znać/NCD
znjese/GHN
zrosće/GHN
zryć/NCZ
zwjedźe/GHN
zwjeze/GHN
zwobodrěć/NCFZ
zwodźěć/NCZ
